District of Columbia statutes.
6-1205

Construction.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as superseding or affecting in any manner any act of Congress heretofore enacted relating to the alteration, repair, or demolition of insanitary or unsafe dwellings or other structures.

History

Sept. 22, 1950, 64 Stat. 904, ch. 984, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-1105.
1973 Ed., § 5-805.